Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.285

Restrictive provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW not applicable to promotional printing and literature of commodity boards.

The restrictive provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW shall not apply to promotional printing and literature for any commodity board.

[ 2015 c 225 s 10; 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 2.]

NOTES: